Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-676.01
Applicability of act.

The Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act does not apply to any public water supplier providing, or intending to provide, ground water for industrial purposes nor does the act apply to any person who is using, or intends to use, ground water for industrial purposes that is supplied by a public water supplier.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 75.